District of Columbia statutes.
42-3227

Lease held by an infant or person with a mental disability — New leases to be of same nature and subject to same liabilities as surrendered leases.

The respective leases to be so renewed, shall operate, and be to the same uses, and be liable to the same trusts, charges, incumbrances, dispositions, devises and conditions, as the leases to be, from time to time, surrendered as aforesaid, were or would have been subject to, in case such surrender had not been made.

29 Geo. 2, ch. 31, § 3, 1756
Kilty’s Rep. 253
Alex. Br. Stat. 790
Comp. Stat. D.C., 335, § 72
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 64(f), 53 DCR 6198
1981 Ed., § 45-1427.
1973 Ed., § 45-929.
D.C. Law 16-305 rewrote the section heading, which formerly read: “Lease held by infant or mentally handicapped—New leases to be of same nature and subject to same liabilities as surrendered leases.”